Wisconsin, session 2025, SB400.
do enact as follows:SB400,11Section 1. 20.932 of the statutes is created to read:SB400,2,3220.932 Use restrictions of state and local government electronic 3devices. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB400,2,54(a) “Foreign country of concern” means a foreign adversary designated under 515 CFR 791.4.SB400,2,96(b) “Local governmental unit” means a political subdivision, a special purpose 7district, an agency or corporation of a political subdivision or special purpose 8district, a school district, or a combination or subunit of any of the foregoing, in this 9state.SB400,2,1310(c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 11commission, independent agency, institution, system, office, society, or other body 12in state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any 13law.SB400,2,1814(2) Use restrictions. (a) No official, employee, or contractor of a state 15agency or local governmental unit, other than a law enforcement officer, as defined 16in s. 967.02 (5), for law enforcement purposes, may do any of the following using an 17electronic device that is owned, operated, or leased by a state agency or local 18governmental unit:SB400,3,2191. Download, use, or access a web-based or other social media application, 1channel, or platform that is owned or operated by an entity located in a foreign 2country of concern.SB400,3,532. Use any software, software application, or artificial intelligence tool or 4algorithm that is owned or operated by an entity located in a foreign country of 5concern.SB400,3,106(b) The prohibitions under par. (a) 1. and 2. do not apply to an official, 7employee, or contractor of a state agency or local governmental unit who obtains a 8written waiver from the secretary of administration for limited purposes related to 9the performance of the duties of the official, employee, or contractor. The secretary 10of administration may issue such waivers at the secretary’s discretion.SB400,3,1111